Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4186.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin LEGISLATIVE PURPOSE.new text end new text begin (a) The purpose of this act is to update Minnesota Statutes as they pertain to a variety of high-speed electric cycle devices collectively referred to as "E-Motos." Although E-Motos are not defined in Minnesota Statutes or this act, the term often refers to devices that are not electric-assisted bicycles or "E-Bikes." This act clarifies that depending on motor power and speed, an E-Moto may be classified and regulated as a legally defined vehicle such as a motorized bicycle, an off-highway motorcycle, or a micromobility device that is powered by an electric motor. E-Moto may also include motorized electric devices that are not defined in state law and are illegal to operate on public roads or lands. new text end new text begin (b) High-profile incidents in Minnesota have involved illegally operated E-Motos. However, the legislature currently lacks clear language to better define and regulate these devices. This act makes appropriate updates to legal definitions and requirements for legal E-Motos and their dealers while explicitly stating that motorized devices not defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 169.011, are not allowed for use on public rights-of-way in Minnesota. new text end new text begin (c) This act does not conflict with the electric-assisted bicycle youth operation study required under Laws 2024, chapter 127, article 3, section 127. new text end new text begin (d) This act does not modify laws governing electric-assisted bicycles. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 84.787, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Off-highway motorcycle. (a) "Off-highway motorcycle" means deleted text begin a motorized,deleted text end new text begin annew text end off-highway vehicle new text begin propelled by an electric or liquid fuel motor, new text end traveling on two wheelsnew text begin ,new text end and having a seat or saddle designed to be straddled by the operator and handlebars for steering control, including a vehicle that is registered under chapter 168 for highway use if it is also used for off-highway operation on trails or unimproved terrain. (b) new text begin Off-highway motorcycle includes a motorized bicycle, as defined in section 169.011, subdivision 45, when used for off-highway operation on trails or unimproved terrain. new text end Off-highway motorcycle does not include an electric-assisted bicycle as defined in section 169.011, subdivision 27. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 84.788, subdivision 12, is amended to read: Subd. 12. Dual registration. (a) An off-highway motorcycle registered under this section may also be registered as a motorcyclenew text begin or motorized bicyclenew text end under chapter 168 for use on public roads and highways. (b) If the off-highway motorcycle was not originally constructed primarily for use on public roads and highways, the off-highway motorcycle must be equipped with mirrors and a headlight, taillight, and horn and be otherwise modified as necessary to meet the requirements of chapter 169, the safety standards of the National Traffic and Motor Safety Act, Code of Federal Regulations, title 49, part 571, and the regulations adopted under that federal act, for motorcycles regarding safety and acceptability to operate on public roads and highways. (c) An applicant for registration under chapter 168 must submit a form, prescribed by the commissioner of public safety. (d) For the purposes of this subdivision, off-highway motorcycle deleted text begin according todeleted text end new text begin , as defined innew text end section 84.787, subdivision 7, does not include a golf cart; mini truck; dune buggy; go-cart; deleted text begin moped; pocket bike; gray market vehicle;deleted text end or vehicle designed and used specifically for lawn maintenance, agriculture, logging, or mining purposes. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.27, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Definitions. (a) For the purposes of this section, the terms in paragraphs (b) to (o) have the meanings given them. (b) "Auctioning motor vehicles" means arranging for and handling the sale of motor vehicles, not the property of the auctioneer, to the highest bidder. (c) "Brokering motor vehicles" means arranging sales or leases between buyers and sellers, or lessees and lessors, of motor vehicles and receiving a fee for those services. (d) "Commercial building" means a permanent, enclosed building that is on a permanent foundation and connected to local sewer and water facilities or otherwise complying with local sanitary codes, is adapted to commercial use, and conforms to local government zoning requirements. "Commercial building" may include strip office malls or garages if a separate entrance and a separate address are maintained and the dealership is clearly identified as a separate business. (e) "Commercial office space" means office space occupying all or part of a commercial building. (f) "Dealer" includes licensed new motor vehicle dealers, used motor vehicle dealers, motor vehicle brokers, wholesalers, auctioneers, lessors of new or used motor vehicles, scrap metal processors, used vehicle parts dealers, and salvage pools. (g) "Horse trailer" is a trailer designed and used to carry horses and other livestock, which has not more than three axles and a maximum gross weight capacity of not more than 24,000 pounds. (h) "Junked vehicle" means a vehicle that is declared unrepairable under section 168A.151. (i) "Leasing motor vehicles" means furnishing a motor vehicle for a fee under a bailor-bailee relationship where no incidences of ownership are intended to be transferred other than the right to use the vehicle for a stated period of time. (j) "Motor vehicle" has the meaning given it in section 168.002, subdivision 18, and also includesnew text begin :new text end new text begin (1)new text end a park trailer as defined in section 168.002, subdivision 23deleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (2) a motorized bicycle, regardless of whether the vehicle is designed and originally manufactured to operate primarily on highways. new text end (k) "Motor vehicle broker" means a person who arranges the sale of a motor vehicle between a buyer and a seller, or the lease of a motor vehicle between a lessee and a lessor, for which service the broker receives a fee. (l) "New motor vehicle" means a motor vehicle other than described in paragraph (n). (m) "Registration year" means the 12-month period for which a dealer license is issued. (n) "Used motor vehicle" means a motor vehicle for which title has been transferred from the person who first acquired it from the manufacturer, distributor, or dealer. A new motor vehicle will not be considered a used motor vehicle until it has been placed in actual operation and not held for resale by an owner who has been granted a certificate of title on the motor vehicle and has registered the motor vehicle in accordance with this chapter and chapters 168A and 297B, or the laws of the residence of the owner. (o) "Wholesaling motor vehicles" means selling new or used motor vehicles to dealers for resale to the public. Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 168.27, subdivision 22, is amended to read: Subd. 22. Dealer license for trailersdeleted text begin , motorized bicyclesdeleted text end ; plates, fees; exemptions. (a) Any person, copartnership, or corporation having a permanent enclosed commercial building or structure either owned in fee or leased and engaged in the business, either exclusively or in addition to any other occupation, of selling deleted text begin motorized bicycles,deleted text end boat trailers, horse trailers, or snowmobile trailers, may apply to the registrar for a dealer's license. Upon payment of a $10 fee the registrar must license the applicant as a dealer for the remainder of the calendar year in which the application was received. The license may be renewed on or before the second day of January of each succeeding year by payment of a fee of $10. (b) The registrar must issue to each dealer, upon request of the dealer, up to 50 dealer plates as provided in subdivision 16 upon payment of $5 for each plate. The plates may be used in the same manner and for the same purposes as is provided in subdivision 16. deleted text begin Except for motorized bicycle dealers,deleted text end The registrar must also issue to the dealer, upon request of the dealer, "in-transit" plates as provided in subdivision 17 upon payment of a fee of $5 for each plate. (c) This subdivision does not abrogate any of the provisions of this section relating to the duties, responsibilities, and requirements of persons, copartnerships, or corporations engaged in the business, either exclusively or in addition to other occupations, of selling motor vehicles or manufactured homes, except that a seller of boat trailers, utility trailers, or snowmobile trailers who is licensed under this subdivision is not required to have a contract or franchise with a manufacturer or distributor of new boat trailers, utility trailers, or new snowmobile trailers the seller proposes to sell, broker, wholesale, or auction. This section does not require a manufacturer of snowmobile trailers whose manufacturing facility is located outside of the metropolitan area as defined in section 473.121 to have a dealer's license to transport the snowmobile trailers to dealers or retail outlets in the state. Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.011, subdivision 40b, is amended to read: Subd. 40b. Micromobility device. (a) "Micromobility device" means a vehicle that: (1) is capable of: (i) being propelled solely by human power; (ii) being powered solely by an electric motor drawing current from rechargeable storage batteries, fuel cells, or other portable sources of electrical current; or (iii) both (i) and (ii); (2) when solely powered by an electric motor, is not capable of propelling the vehicle at a speed greater than deleted text begin 30deleted text end new text begin 20new text end miles per hour on a paved level surface; and (3) has an unloaded weight of up to deleted text begin 500deleted text end new text begin 100new text end pounds. (b) Micromobility device includes a bicycle, a motorized foot scooter, and an electric personal assistive mobility device. deleted text begin Micromobility device includes a motorized bicycle that meets the requirements under paragraph (a).deleted text end Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.011, subdivision 45, is amended to read: Subd. 45. Motorized bicycle. "Motorized bicycle" means a bicycle that is propelled by an electricnew text begin motor of more than 750 watts but less than 1,500 wattsnew text end or a liquid fuel motor of a piston displacement capacity of 50 cubic centimeters or less, and a maximum of two brake horsepower, which is capable of a maximum speed of not more than 30 miles per hour on a flat surface with not more than one percent grade in any direction when the motor is engaged. Motorized bicycle does not include an electric-assisted bicycle as defined in subdivision 27. Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.02, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Application to persons, places, and vehicles. new text begin (a) new text end The provisions of this chapter relating to the operation of vehicles refer exclusively to the operation of vehicles upon highways, and upon highways, streets, private roads, and roadways situated on property owned, leased, or occupied by the regents of the University of Minnesota, or the University of Minnesota, except: (1) where a different place is specifically referred to in a given section; (2) the provisions of sections 169.09 to 169.13 apply to any person who drives, operates, or is in physical control of a motor vehicle within this state or upon the ice of any boundary water of this state, and to any person who drives, operates, or is in physical control of a snowmobile on a snowmobile trail within this state. new text begin (b) A vehicle that does not meet the specifications of a vehicle defined in section 169.011, either as that vehicle was originally manufactured or subsequently modified, must not be operated upon the highways of Minnesota. new text end Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.223, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Electrical safety standards. new text end new text begin No person may sell a motorized bicycle powered by an electric motor unless the motorized bicycle has been certified by an independent third-party ISO-17065 certified laboratory for compliance with ANSI/CAN/UL Standard 2272 and bears the certification mark of the laboratory. new text end Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.974, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Electrical safety standards. new text end new text begin No person may sell a motorcycle powered by an electric motor unless the motorcycle has been certified by an independent third-party ISO-17065 certified laboratory for compliance with ANSI/CAN/UL Standard 2272 and bears the certification mark of the laboratory. new text end